Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 339.285 to
339.303.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Behavior intervention plan” has the meaning given that term in ORS 343.154.
(b) “504 Plan” means an education plan developed for a student in accordance with  sec-
tion 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794.
(c) “Individualized education program” has the meaning given that term in ORS 343.035.
(2) When the  Department of Human Services conducts an investigation under ORS
419B.019 of a report of suspected abuse of a student in a  public education program and the
department finds that the report of abuse is founded, the department shall determine that
the public education program is responsible for the abuse if:
(a) The abuse involved the use of restraint  or seclusion and the public education program
failed to ensure that a sufficient number of personnel, appropriately trained in the use  of
restraint and seclusion, were available to comply with  the individualized education programs,
504 Plans and behavior intervention plans of  the students who were present in the setting
where the abuse occurred at the time the abuse occurred;
(b)(A) The abuse  involved the use of restraint, seclusion or neglect and the public edu-
cation program failed to provide the personnel involved  with the restraint, seclusion or
neglect with access to the student’s individualized education program,  504 Plan or behavior
intervention program or failed  to provide the personnel with adequate training to appropri-
ately perform health-related or personal care tasks; and
(B) The personnel were not aware of, and failed to provide the services and supports  in
the manner required by, the student’s  individualized education program, 504 Plan or behavior
plan;
(c) The abuse involved  the use of restraint or seclusion, a superior ordered personnel to
impose the restraint or seclusion, and the personnel who imposed the restraint  or seclusion
reasonably believed that failure to comply with the order would result in termination  or
discipline; or
(d)(A) The abuse involved the use of restraint or seclusion and the public education pro-
gram failed to  ensure that the personnel who imposed the restraint or seclusion were ap-
propriately trained in the use of restraint and seclusion;
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 1
(B) The personnel who imposed the  restraint or seclusion reasonably believed that failure
to impose the restraint or seclusion would lead to serious  bodily injury of the student or
others; and
(C) If the personnel imposed a restraint, it was not a type of  restraint prohibited under
ORS 339.288.
SECTION 3.  ORS 419B.005, as amended by  section 8, chapter 90, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended
to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any assault, as defined in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a  child
which has been caused by other than accidental means, including any injury which appears  to be
at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental  injury to a child, which shall include only observable and substantial impairment
of the child’s mental or psychological ability to function caused by cruelty to the  child, with due
regard to the culture of the child.
(C) Rape of a child, which includes but is not limited to  rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a minor, as  defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct  which allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to engage
in the performing for people  to observe or the photographing, filming, tape recording or other ex-
hibition which, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as  defined in ORS 167.002 or
described in ORS 163.665 and  163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a child, but not in-
cluding any conduct which is part of any  investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or
which is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring  a child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to  purchase sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or  to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as described in ORS
167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child, including but not limited  to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care that  is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial  risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting  a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to  the unlawful
manufacturing of a cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to  a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
(K) The restraint or seclusion  of a child in violation of ORS 339.285, 339.288, 339.291,
339.303 or 339.308.
(L) The infliction of corporal punishment on a child in violation of ORS 339.250 (9).
(b) “Abuse” does not include reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in  one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is under 21 years of age and residing  in or receiving care or services at a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 2
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment  of the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the  receipt of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician assistant licensed under  ORS chapter 677 or naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed  practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department of  Human Services, Oregon Health Authority, Early Learning
Division, Department of Education, Youth Development Division,  Office of Child Care, the Oregon
Youth  Authority,  a local health department, a community mental health program, a community de-
velopmental disabilities program,  a county juvenile department, a child-caring agency as that term
is defined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) A court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) A child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) An elected official of a branch of government of  this state or a state agency, board, com-
mission or department of a  branch of government of this state or of a city, county or other political
subdivision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) An operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) An operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or organization  facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents  pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 3
(bb) An  employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or activ-
ities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or  camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined  in ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to  victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or
human trafficking.
(cc) A coach, assistant coach or trainer of an amateur,  semiprofessional or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of a school district board, an education service district board or  a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) An individual who is paid by  a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a
service identified in an individualized written  service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 419B.005, as  amended by section 58, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, section
16, chapter 27, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 7, chapter 90, Oregon Laws 2022, is  amended to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any assault, as defined in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a  child
which has been caused by other than accidental means, including any injury which appears  to be
at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental  injury to a child, which shall include only observable and substantial impairment
of the child’s mental or psychological ability to function caused by cruelty to the  child, with due
regard to the culture of the child.
(C) Rape of a child, which includes but is not limited to  rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a minor, as  defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct  which allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to engage
in the performing for people  to observe or the photographing, filming, tape recording or other ex-
hibition which, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as  defined in ORS 167.002 or
described in ORS 163.665 and  163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a child, but not in-
cluding any conduct which is part of any  investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or
which is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring  a child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to  purchase sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or  to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as described in ORS
167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child, including but not limited  to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care that  is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial  risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 4
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises  where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful exposure  to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to the unlawful
manufacturing of a  cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
(K) The restraint or seclusion of a child in violation of  ORS 339.285, 339.288, 339.291,
339.303 or 339.308.
(L) The infliction of corporal punishment on a child in violation of ORS 339.250 (9).
(b) “Abuse” does not  include reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is under 21 years of age and residing in  or receiving care or services at a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment  of the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the  receipt of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician assistant licensed under  ORS chapter 677 or naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed  practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department  of Human Services, Oregon Health Authority, Department of
Early Learning and Care, Department of Education, Youth Development Division, Office of  Child
Care, the Oregon Youth Authority, a local health department, a community mental health  program,
a community developmental disabilities program, a county juvenile department, a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 5
(q) A court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) A child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) An elected official of a branch of government  of this state or a state agency, board, com-
mission or department of a  branch of government of this state or of a city, county or other political
subdivision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) An operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) An operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or  organization facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents  pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) An employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or  activ-
ities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or  camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined  in ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to  victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or
human trafficking.
(cc) A coach, assistant coach or trainer of an amateur,  semiprofessional or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of a school district board, an education service district board or  a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) An individual who is paid by  a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a
service identified in an individualized written  service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 419B.005, as amended by section 8, chapter 90, Oregon Laws 2022, and section
3 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any  assault, as defined in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child
which has been  caused by other than accidental means, including any injury which appears to be
at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental  injury to a child, which shall include only observable and substantial impairment
of the child’s mental  or psychological ability to function caused by cruelty to the child, with due
regard to the culture of the child.
(C) Rape of a child, which  includes but is not limited to rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 6
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a  minor, as defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct which allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to  engage
in the performing for people to observe or the photographing, filming, tape  recording or other ex-
hibition which, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as  defined in ORS 167.002 or
described in ORS 163.665 and  163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a child, but not in-
cluding any conduct which is part of any  investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or
which is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring  a child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act as defined in ORS 163.266, to  purchase sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or  to engage in commercial sexual solicitation as described in ORS
167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child, including but not limited  to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care that  is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial  risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting  a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to  the unlawful
manufacturing of a cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to  a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
[(K) The restraint or seclusion of a child in violation of ORS  339.285, 339.288, 339.291, 339.303 or
339.308.]
[(L)] (K) The infliction of corporal punishment on a child in violation of ORS 339.250 (9).
(b) “Abuse” does not  include reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is under 21 years of age and residing in  or receiving care or services at a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment  of the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the  receipt of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician assistant licensed under  ORS chapter 677 or naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed  practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 7
(e) Employee of the Department of  Human Services, Oregon Health Authority, Early Learning
Division, Department of Education, Youth Development Division,  Office of Child Care, the Oregon
Youth  Authority,  a local health department, a community mental health program, a community de-
velopmental disabilities program,  a county juvenile department, a child-caring agency as that term
is defined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) A court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) A child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) An elected official of a branch of government  of this state or a state agency, board, com-
mission or department of a  branch of government of this state or of a city, county or other political
subdivision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) An operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) An operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or  organization facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents  pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) An employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or  activ-
ities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or  camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined  in ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to  victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or
human trafficking.
(cc) A coach, assistant coach or trainer of an amateur,  semiprofessional or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of a school district board, an education service district board or  a public charter
school governing body.
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 8
(hh) An individual who is paid by  a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a
service identified in an individualized written  service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 419B.005, as  amended by section 58, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, section
16, chapter 27, Oregon  Laws 2022, section 7, chapter 90, Oregon Laws 2022, and section 4 of this
2023 Act, is amended to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any  assault, as defined in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child
which has been  caused by other than accidental means, including any injury which appears to be
at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental  injury to a child, which shall include only observable and substantial impairment
of the child’s mental  or psychological ability to function caused by cruelty to the child, with due
regard to the culture of the child.
(C) Rape of a child, which  includes but is not limited to rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a  minor, as defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct which allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to  engage
in the performing for people to observe or the photographing, filming, tape  recording or other ex-
hibition which, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as  defined in ORS 167.002 or
described in ORS 163.665 and 163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a  child, but not in-
cluding any conduct which is part of any  investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or
which is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring  a child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act  as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or to engage in commercial sexual solicitation  as described in ORS
167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or maltreatment  of a child, including but not limited to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care  that is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm to  a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises  where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful exposure  to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to the unlawful
manufacturing of a  cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
[(K) The restraint or seclusion of a child in violation of ORS  339.285, 339.288, 339.291, 339.303 or
339.308.]
[(L)] (K)  The infliction of corporal punishment on a child in violation of ORS 339.250 (9).
(b) “Abuse” does not include reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in  one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is under 21 years of age and residing  in or receiving care or services at a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 9
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment  of the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the  receipt of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician assistant licensed under  ORS chapter 677 or naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed  practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department  of Human Services, Oregon Health Authority, Department of
Early Learning and Care, Department of Education, Youth Development Division, Office of  Child
Care, the Oregon Youth Authority, a local health department, a community mental health  program,
a community developmental disabilities program, a county juvenile department, a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) A court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) A child care provider registered or certified under ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) An elected official of a branch of government  of this state or a state agency, board, com-
mission or department of a  branch of government of this state or of a city, county or other political
subdivision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) An operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) An operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or  organization facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents  pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) An employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or  activ-
ities:
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 10
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or  camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined  in ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to  victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or
human trafficking.
(cc) A coach, assistant coach or trainer of an amateur,  semiprofessional or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of a school district board, an education service district board or  a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) An individual who is paid by  a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a
service identified in an individualized written  service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 419B.019 is amended to read:
419B.019. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Agent” means a person who:
(A) Acts as an agent for an education provider in a manner that requires the person to  have
direct, unsupervised contact with children; and
(B) Interacts with a child because of the person’s status as an agent for an education provider.
(b) “Contractor” means a person who:
(A) Provides services to  an education provider under a contract in a manner that requires the
person to have direct, unsupervised contact with children; and
(B) Interacts with a child  because of the person’s status as a contractor for an education pro-
vider.
(c) “Education provider” has the meaning given that term in ORS 339.370.
(d) “School employee” means a person who:
(A) Is an employee of an education provider; and
(B) Interacts with a child because of the person’s status as an employee of  an education pro-
vider.
(e) “Volunteer” means a person who:
(A) Acts as a volunteer for an education provider in a  manner that requires the person to have
direct, unsupervised contact with children; and
(B) Interacts with a child because of the  person’s status as a volunteer of an education provider.
(2) A law enforcement agency or the Department of Human Services must  conduct an investi-
gation as provided by ORS 419B.020 if the law enforcement agency or  department receives a report
of abuse that involves a child and a person who is a school employee, contractor, agent or volunteer.
(3) A law enforcement agency shall  notify the department as provided by ORS 419B.015 if the
law enforcement agency receives a report  described in subsection (2) of this section. The department
shall notify a law enforcement agency as provided by  ORS 419B.015 if the department receives a
report described in subsection (2) of this section. The department shall  ensure that an investigation
related to the report is conducted if the report is not investigated by a law enforcement agency.
(4)(a) Within three business days  of receiving a report or notification of a report described in
subsection (2) of this section, the department shall notify:
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 11
(A) The appropriate education provider to ensure the safety of the child, if the department  be-
lieves the report of suspected abuse involves the child and a person who  is a school employee,
contractor, agent or volunteer;
(B) The Teacher Standards and Practices  Commission, if the department believes the school
employee, contractor, agent or volunteer is licensed, registered or certified by the commission; or
(C) The Department of Education, if the Department of  Human Services believes the report of
suspected abuse:
(i) Occurred in a school or was related to a school-sponsored activity; or
(ii) Involves a child and a person who is a school employee, contractor, agent or volunteer.
(b) For the purpose of notification made under  this subsection, the Department of Human Ser-
vices may not disclose the name  and address of, and other identifying information about, the person
who made the report, but the department shall make available any information necessary to  ensure
the safety of the child, including the name of the school and the name of the person who  may have
conducted the suspected abuse. Except as provided by ORS 339.389, any person or  entity to whom
notification is made under this subsection may not release any information not  authorized by this
subsection.
(c) When the Department of Education receives notification under this subsection, the depart-
ment shall act under, and is subject to, ORS 339.389.
(5) The Department of Human Services shall  submit a report on the first day of every
calendar quarter to the committees or interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to child welfare, for the  purposes of public review and oversight of the quality and
safety of education providers. Information provided in reports under this subsection  may not
contain the name of a child or any identifying information about  a child. The reports must
contain all of  the following information about each investigation described in subsection (2)
of this section  that resulted in a finding, during the preceding quarter, that the report of
abuse was substantiated:
(a) The name of the education provider where the department conducted  the investi-
gation;
(b) The approximate date that the abuse occurred;
(c) The nature of the abuse and a brief narrative description of  the abuse that occurred;
and
(d) Whether a reportable injury, sexual abuse or death resulted from the abuse.
[(5)] (6)  The department [ of Human Services ] may adopt any rules  necessary for the adminis-
tration of this section.
SECTION 8.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 419B.005 (1)(a)(K), at the conclusion of an  investi-
gation under ORS 419B.020, the Department of Human Services may not substantiate an
allegation of abuse against personnel of a public  education program who have not been
trained to the  standard established in ORS 339.300 but who impose a restraint on a student
if:
(a) The restraint is imposed  in response to an imminent risk of serious bodily injury of
any person;
(b) The person imposing the restraint does not  act with reckless disregard for student
safety; and
(c) The restraint does not impose a significant risk of impeding the student’s breathing.
(2) Nothing  in this section prohibits the department from finding that the public educa-
tion program is responsible under section 2 of this 2023 Act  for abuse arising from the un-
trained personnel’s inappropriate use of restraint.
(3) As used in this section, “public education program” and “restraint” have  the
meanings given those terms in ORS 339.285.
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1 (2), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 5026), for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, for state assessments and
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 12
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $205,644 for two positions in the Office of Training,
Investigations and Safety.
SECTION 10.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (8), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, and Medicare re-
ceipts and including federal funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental
Security Income recoveries and the Child Care and Development  Fund, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in  section 2 (8), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled House Bill 5026), collected  or received by the Department of Human Services for
shared services is increased by $339,279 for  two positions in the Office of Training, Investi-
gations and Safety.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  and the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill
5026), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, and Medicare re-
ceipts and  including federal funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security Supplemental
Security Income recoveries and the Child Care and Development  Fund, but excluding lottery
funds and federal funds not described in section 2 (2),  chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023 (En-
rolled House Bill 5026), collected or received by the Department  of Human Services for state
assessments and enterprise-wide costs  is increased by $2,615 for two positions in the Office
of Training, Investigations and Safety.
SECTION 12. Section 8 of this 2023 Act is repealed on June 30, 2028.
SECTION 13. (1) Section 2 of this 2023 Act and the amendments to ORS 419B.005 by
sections 3 and 4 of this 2023 Act apply to incidents occurring on or after July 1, 2023.
(2) The amendments to ORS 419B.005 by  sections 5 and 6 of this 2023 Act apply to inci-
dents occurring on or after July 1, 2028.
(3) The quarterly report  described in the amendments to ORS 419B.019 by section 7 of
this 2023 Act is first due on January 1, 2024.
SECTION 14. The amendments to ORS 419B.005 by sections 5 and 6 of this 2023 Act be-
come operative on July 1, 2028.
SECTION 15. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 13
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-B) Page 14